Utah statutes.
76-10-808.   Relief granted for public nuisance.

If the existence of a public nuisance as defined by subsection 76-10-803(1)(b) is admitted or established, either in a civil or criminal proceeding, a judgment shall be entered which shall:

(a)  Permanently enjoin each defendant and any other person from further maintaining the nuisance at the place complained of and each defendant from maintaining such nuisance elsewhere;

(b)  Direct the person enjoined to surrender to the sheriff of the county in which the action was brought any material in his possession which is subject to the injunction, and the sheriff shall seize and destroy this material; and

(c)  Without proof of special injury direct that an accounting be had and all money and other consideration paid as admission to view any motion picture film determined to constitute a public nuisance, or paid for any publication determined to constitute a public nuisance, in either case without deduction for expenses, be forfeited and paid into the general fund of the county where the nuisance was maintained.

